Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 9. Environmental Education.

Sec. 14.30.380.
Environmental education.

The board shall encourage each school board to initiate and conduct a program of environmental education for kindergarten through grade 12. The program should include, but is not limited to, education regarding the need to balance resource development with environmental safeguards, the dependence of the state on resource development, and the opportunity for pollution prevention, waste reduction, and recycling. A school board may implement environmental education as a part of regular classroom studies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 63 SLA 1992)